District of Columbia statutes.
7-2124

Personnel training.

Hospitals shall have written policies and procedures to ensure that all personnel who provide care or information to a victim of sexual assault:

(1)

Are trained to provide medically and factually accurate and objective information about prophylactic antibiotics for the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases and emergency contraception for the prevention of pregnancy to a victim of sexual assault;

(2)

Actually provide that information to a victim of sexual assault; and

(3)

Ensure immediate access to prophylactic antibiotics for the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases and emergency contraception for the prevention of pregnancy to each victim of sexual assault, if requested and such treatment is not medically contraindicated.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-346, § 5, 56 DCR 966